California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) Use of community-based physicians.

(C) Marketing practices.

(D) Development of a streamlined PACE waiver process.

(2) This subdivision shall be operative upon federal approval of a capitation rate methodology pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 14301.1.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 30, Sec. 34) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 77.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14594.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code shall apply.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the practice of telehealth as a legitimate means by which an individual may receive health care services from a health care provider without in-person contact with the health care provider.

(c) No PACE organization shall require that in-person contact occur between a health care
 provider and a patient before payment is made for the covered services appropriately provided through telehealth, subject to the terms and conditions of the contract entered into between the enrollee or subscriber and the PACE organization, and between the PACE organization and its participating providers or provider groups.

(d) No PACE organization shall limit the type of setting where services are provided for the patient or by the health care provider before payment is made for the covered services appropriately provided through telehealth, subject to the terms and conditions of the contract entered into between the enrollee or subscriber and the PACE organization, and between the PACE organization and its participating providers or provider groups.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision, this section shall not be interpreted to authorize a PACE organization to require the use of telehealth when the health care provider has determined that it is not appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 782, Sec. 14.   (AB 1733)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.8. Medi-Cal Management: Alternative Methods [14600. - 14685.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14600. - 14601.]

14600.

The Legislature finds and declares that expenditure demands on health service costs at the federal, state, and local level, now, and will in the foreseeable future, exceed available public resources. In order to live within fiscal constraints, the state must develop alternative methods of managing Medi-Cal care that utilizes resources to the maximum advantage of people requiring public medical assistance.

The purposes of the program alternatives described in this chapter are to provide limited implementation and experimentation prior to statewide enactment of these alternative approaches to funding and management of health care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Department” means State Department of Health Services.

(b) “Director” means State Director of Health Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Negotiated Hospital Rates [14610. - 14620.]

14610.

As used in this article:

(a) “Rate” means the rate of reimbursement per unit of service which is agreed to by the department and a hospital.

(b) “Unit of service” means an inpatient day, a case, a discharge or admission, an episode, or any other measure of service which is a basis for reimbursement agreed to by a hospital and the department.

(c) “Commission” means the California Health Facilities Commission.

(d) “Private entity” means any private organization with appropriate experience and expertise to negotiate Medi-Cal hospital reimbursement rates on behalf of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14611.

It is the intention of the Legislature to enact a method for reimbursing hospitals for inpatient and outpatient services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries on a prospectively negotiated contractual basis. The provisions of this article are intended to develop and test alternatives for contractually arranging for the payment and delivery of such services which will become the basis for a permanent contracting system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14612.

The Legislature further intends that the alternatives developed and tested pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be consistent with the following objectives:

(a) Providing reasonable access to all levels and types of hospital care by beneficiaries.

(b) Providing reasonable geographical access to hospital care by beneficiaries.

(c) Promoting efficiency and economy in the delivery of hospital care.

(d) Fairness to the contracting hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14613.

(a) The department shall develop at least three alternative methods of reimbursing hospitals for providing inpatient and outpatient hospital services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries on a prospectively negotiated rate basis. Each method shall provide for prospectively negotiating rates for such care. Each method shall require the hospital to agree to provide a minimal number of units of service at the negotiated rate.

(b) The department shall consult with associations and other appropriate representatives of the hospital industry. The department shall make every reasonable effort to develop at least one alternative for prospectively negotiating hospital rates which is supported by such representatives of the hospital industry.

(c) The department shall consult with the commission regarding the development of at least one alternative for prospectively negotiating hospital rates. The department may enter into an interagency agreement with the commission for the development of such an alternative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14614.

Each alternative method for prospectively negotiated rate reimbursement developed pursuant to this article shall do the following:

(a) Reduce administrative cost to the department and to hospitals.

(b) Provide incentives to hospitals to participate in the Medi-Cal program, including prospective interim payments, unless the parties agree otherwise.

(c) Provide incentives to hospitals to provide services on an outpatient basis wherever possible.

(d) Provide incentives to hospitals to reduce their costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14616.

Not sooner than 30 days after providing notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the department may implement on a test basis any of the alternatives for prospective hospital rate negotiations which have been reported to the Legislature pursuant to Section 14614. The department may enter into an interagency agreement with the commission, or contract with a private entity, for implementing any such alternative.

In testing alternatives, the department shall attempt to obtain participation by hospitals representing various sizes, types, ownership, and geographic locations. The department may not discriminate against hospitals wishing to participate on the basis of any of the characteristics described in the immediately preceding sentence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14617.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require that hospitals participate in a prospectively negotiated rate test, as provided by this article, as a condition of participation in the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14619.

For the 1981–82 fiscal year, the Controller may transfer such funds among Items 426-001-001, 426-001-890, 426-101-001, and 426-101-890 of the Budget Act of 1981 as are necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14620.

Authority to implement negotiated hospital rates after the completion of the pilot study and after June 30, 1983, shall be contingent on both of the following:

(a) A special Budget Act item, following the submission by the State Department of Health Services of a final report which evaluates the results of the projects conducted under the provisions of this article.

(b) Enactment of legislation specifying the negotiated hospital rate program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 133.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Mental Health Managed Care [14680. - 14685.1.]

14680.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a need to establish a standard set of guidelines that governs the provision of managed Medi-Cal specialty mental health services at the local level, consistent with federal law.

(b) Therefore, in order to ensure quality and continuity, and to efficiently utilize mental health services under the Medi-Cal program, there shall be developed mental health plans for the provision of those services that are consistent with guidelines established by the
 department. The guidelines shall be consistent with federal Medicaid requirements and the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers to ensure full and timely federal reimbursement to mental health plans for services that are rendered and reimbursed consistent with federal Medicaid requirements.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that mental health plans be developed and implemented regardless of whether other systems of Medi-Cal managed care are implemented.

(d) It is further the intent of the Legislature that Sections 14681 to 14685, inclusive, shall not be construed to mandate the participation of counties in Medi-Cal managed mental health care plans.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 651, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 236.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14681.

The department shall ensure that all contracts for Medi-Cal managed care include a process for screening, referral, and coordination with any mental health plan established, of medically necessary specialty mental health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 237.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14682.1.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall be designated as the state agency responsible for development, consistent with the requirements of Section 4060, and implementation of, mental health plans for Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(b) The department shall convene a steering committee for the purpose of providing advice and recommendations on the transition and continuing development of the Medi-Cal mental health managed care systems pursuant to subdivision (a). The committee shall include work groups to advise the department of major issues to be addressed in the managed mental health care plan, as well as system transition and transformation issues pertaining to the delivery
 of mental health care services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, including services to children provided through the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment Program.

(c) The committee shall consist of diverse representatives of concerned and involved communities, including, but not limited to, beneficiaries, their families, providers, mental health professionals, substance use disorder treatment professionals, statewide representatives of health care service plans, representatives of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, public and private organizations, county behavioral health directors, and others as determined by the department. The department has the authority to structure this steering committee process in a manner that is conducive for addressing issues effectively, and for providing a transparent, collaborative, meaningful
 process to ensure a more diverse and representative approach to problem-solving and dissemination of information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 32.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14683.

The department shall ensure all of the following:

(a) That mental health plans include a process for screening, referral, and coordination with other necessary services, including, but not limited to, health, housing, and vocational rehabilitation services. For Medi-Cal eligible children, the mental health plans shall also provide
 coordination with education programs and any necessary medical or rehabilitative services, including, but not limited to, those provided under the California Children’s Services Program (Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code) and the Child Health and Disability Prevention Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), and those provided by a fee-for-service provider or a Medi-Cal managed care plan. This subdivision shall not be construed to establish any higher level of service from a county than is required under existing law. The mental health plan shall not be liable for the failure of other agencies responsible for the provision of
 nonmental health services to provide those services or to participate in coordination efforts.

(b) That mental health plans include a system of outreach to enable Medi-Cal beneficiaries and providers to participate in and access Medi-Cal specialty mental health services under the plans, consistent with existing law.

(c) That standards for quality and access developed by the department in consultation with the steering committee established pursuant to Section
 14682.1 are included in mental health plans serving Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 240.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14684.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, mental health plans, whether administered by public or private entities, shall be governed by the following guidelines:

(1) State and federal Medi-Cal funds identified for the diagnosis and treatment of mental illness shall be used solely for those purposes. Administrative costs incurred by counties for activities necessary for the administration of the mental health plan shall be clearly identified and shall be reimbursed in a manner consistent with federal Medicaid
 requirements and the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers. Administrative requirements shall be based on and limited to federal Medicaid requirements and the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers, and shall not impose costs exceeding funds available for that purpose.

(2) The development of the mental health plan shall include a public planning process that includes a significant role for Medi-Cal beneficiaries, family members, mental health advocates, providers, and public and private contract agencies.

(3) The mental health plan shall include appropriate standards relating to quality, access, and coordination of services within a managed system of care, and costs established under the plan, and shall provide opportunities for existing Medi-Cal providers to continue to provide services under the mental health plan, as long as the providers meet those standards.

(4) Continuity of care for current recipients of services shall be ensured in the transition to managed mental health care.

(5) Medi-Cal covered specialty mental health services shall be provided in the beneficiary’s home community, or as close as possible to the beneficiary’s home community. Pursuant to the objectives of the rehabilitation option described in subdivision (a) of Section 14021.4, mental health services may be provided in a facility, a home, or other community-based site.

(6) Medi-Cal beneficiaries whose mental or emotional condition results or has resulted in functional impairment, as defined by the department, shall be eligible for covered
 specialty mental health services. Emphasis shall be placed on adults with serious and persistent mental illness and children with serious emotional disturbances, as defined by the department.

(7) Mental health plans shall provide specialty mental health services to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries, including both adults and children. Specialty mental health services include Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment Services to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the age of 21 pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(a)(4)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(8) Each mental health plan shall include a mechanism for monitoring the effectiveness of, and evaluating accessibility and quality of, services available. The plan shall utilize and be based upon state-adopted performance outcome measures and shall include review of individual service plan procedures and practices, a beneficiary satisfaction component, and a grievance system for beneficiaries and providers.

(9) Each mental health plan shall provide for culturally competent and age-appropriate services, to the extent feasible. The mental health plan shall assess the cultural competency needs of the program. The mental health plan shall include, as part of
 the quality assurance program required by Section
 14725, a process to accommodate the significant needs with reasonable timeliness. The department shall provide demographic data and technical assistance. Performance outcome measures shall include a reliable method of measuring and reporting the extent to which services are culturally competent and age-appropriate.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 651, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 241.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14684.1.

(a) The department shall establish a process for second level treatment authorization request appeals to review and resolve disputes between mental health plans and hospitals.

(b) When the department establishes an appeals process, the department shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The department shall review appeals initiated by hospitals and render decisions on appeals based on findings that are the result of a review of supporting documents
 submitted by mental health plans and hospitals.

(2) If the department upholds a mental health plan denial of payment of a hospital claim, a review fee shall be assessed on the provider.

(3) If the department reverses a mental health plan denial of payment of a hospital claim, a review fee shall be assessed on the mental health plan.

(4) If the department decision regarding a mental health plan denial of payment upholds the claim in part and reverses the claim in part, the department shall prorate the review fee between the parties accordingly.

(c) The
 amount of the review fees shall be calculated and adjusted annually. The methodology and calculation used to determine the fee amounts shall result in an aggregate fee amount that, in conjunction with any other outside source of funding for this function, may not exceed the aggregate annual costs of providing second level treatment authorization request reviews.

(d) Fees collected by the department shall be retained by the department and used to offset administrative and personnel services costs associated with the appeals process.

(e) The department may use the fees collected, in conjunction with other available appropriate funding for this function, to contract for the performance of the appeals process function.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 242.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14685.1.

Section 14685 is hereby repealed on November 7, 2012, if Section 36 has been added to Article XIII of the California Constitution as of that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 244.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.9. Transition of Community-Based Medi-Cal Mental Health [14700. - 14727.]

14700.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer to the State Department of Health Care Services, no later than July 1, 2012, the state administration of Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care, the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) Program, and applicable functions related to federal Medicaid requirements, from the State Department of Mental Health.

(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature for this transfer to occur in an efficient and effective manner, with no unintended interruptions in service delivery to clients and families. This transfer is intended to do all of the following:

(A) Improve access to culturally appropriate community-based mental health services, including a focus on client recovery, social rehabilitation services, and peer support.

(B) Effectively integrate the financing of services, including the receipt of federal funds, to more effectively provide services.

(C) Improve state accountabilities and outcomes.

(D) Provide focused, high-level leadership for behavioral health services within the state administrative structure.

(b) Effective July 1, 2012, the state administrative functions for the operation of Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care, the EPSDT Program, and applicable functions related to federal Medicaid requirements, that were
 performed by the State Department of Mental Health shall be transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services. This state administrative transfer shall conform to a state administrative transition plan provided to the fiscal and applicable policy committees of the Legislature as soon as feasible, but no later than October 1, 2011. This state administrative transition plan may also be updated by the Governor and provided to all fiscal and applicable policy committees of the Legislature upon its completion, but no later than May 15, 2012.

(c) All regulations and orders concerning Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care and the EPSDT Program shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the State Department of Health Care Services, or until they expire by their own terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 20.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14701.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in collaboration with the State Department of State Hospitals and the California Health and Human Services Agency, shall create a state administrative and programmatic transition plan, either as one comprehensive transition plan or separately, to guide the transfer of the Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care and the EPSDT Program to the State Department of Health Care Services effective July 1, 2012.

(b) (1) Commencing no later than July 15, 2011, the State Department of Health Care Services, together with the State Department of State Hospitals, shall convene a series of stakeholder meetings and forums to receive input from clients, family
 members, providers, counties, and representatives of the Legislature concerning the transition and transfer of Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care and the EPSDT Program. This consultation shall inform the creation of a state administrative transition plan and a programmatic transition plan that shall include, but is not limited to, the following components:

(A) The plan shall ensure that it is developed in a way that continues access and quality of service during and immediately after the transition, preventing any disruption of services to clients and family members, providers and counties, and others affected by this transition.

(B) A detailed description of the state administrative functions currently performed by the State Department of Mental Health regarding Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care and the EPSDT Program.

(C) Explanations of the operational steps, timelines, and key milestones for determining when and how each function or program will be transferred. These explanations shall also be developed for the transition of positions and staff serving Medi-Cal specialty mental health managed care and the EPSDT Program, and how these will relate to, and align with, positions at the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services and the California Health and Human Services Agency shall consult with the Department of Human Resources in developing this aspect of the transition plan.

(D) A list of any planned or proposed changes or efficiencies in how the functions will be performed, including the anticipated fiscal and programmatic impacts of the changes.

(E) A detailed organization chart that
 reflects the planned staffing at the State Department of Health Care Services in light of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, and includes focused, high-level leadership for behavioral health issues.

(F) A description of how stakeholders were included in the various phases of the planning process to formulate the transition plans and a description of how their feedback will be taken into consideration after transition activities are underway.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services, together with the State Department of State Hospitals and the California Health and Human Services Agency, shall convene and consult with stakeholders at least twice following production of a draft of the transition plans and before submission of transition plans to the Legislature. Continued consultation with stakeholders shall occur in accordance with the requirement in
 subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 200.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14702.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Health Care Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 245.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14703.

Contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) and Chapter 2 (commencing with section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 246.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14704.

A regulation or order concerning Medi-Cal specialty mental health services adopted by the State Department of Mental Health pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000), as in effect preceding the effective date of this section, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable, unless and until the readoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation or order by the department, or until it expires by its own terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 247.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14705.

(a) (1) This section shall apply to specialty mental health services provided by counties to Medi-Cal eligible individuals. Counties shall provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and seek the maximum federal reimbursement possible for services rendered to persons with mental illnesses.

(2) To the extent permitted under federal law and Section 5892, funds distributed to the counties from the Mental Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Equity Subaccount, and the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund, funds from the Mental Health Account and the Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund, and any other funds from which the Controller makes distributions to
 the counties may be used to pay for services provided by these funds that the counties can then certify as public expenditures in order to achieve the maximum federal reimbursement possible for services pursuant to this chapter.

(3) The standards and guidelines for the administration of specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal eligible persons shall be consistent with federal Medicaid requirements, as specified in the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers to ensure full and timely federal reimbursement to counties for services that are rendered and claimed consistent with federal Medicaid requirements.

(b) With regard to each person receiving specialty mental health services from a mental health plan, the mental health plan shall verify whether the person is Medi-Cal eligible and, if determined to be Medi-Cal eligible, the person shall be referred when appropriate to a
 facility, clinic, or program that is certified for Medi-Cal reimbursement.

(c) With regard to county operated facilities, clinics, or programs for which claims are submitted to the department for Medi-Cal reimbursement for specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal eligible individuals, the county shall ensure that all requirements necessary for Medi-Cal reimbursement for these services are complied with, including, but not limited to, utilization review and the submission of yearend cost reports by December 31 following the close of the fiscal year.

(d) Counties shall certify to the state that they have incurred public expenditures prior to requesting the reimbursement of federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 73.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14705.5.

Each public or private facility or agency providing local specialty mental health services pursuant to a county performance contract plan shall make a written certification within 30 days after a patient is admitted to the facility as a patient or first given services by such a facility or agency, to the local mental health director of the county, stating whether or not each of these patients is presumed to be eligible for
 specialty mental health services under the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5719 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 153.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14705.7.

Mental health plans may contract with providers on a negotiated net amount basis in the same manner as set forth in Section 5705. Negotiated net amounts or rates shall not be in contracts between the state and mental health plans for specialty mental health services. Reimbursement to mental health plans that have certified public expenditures shall be consistent with
 federal Medicaid requirements for calculating upper payment limits, as specified in the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5716 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 150.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14706.

(a) The department shall have responsibility for conducting investigations and audits of claims and reimbursements for expenditures for specialty mental health services provided by mental health
 plans to Medi-Cal eligible individuals.

(b) The amount of the payment or repayment of federal funds in accordance with audit findings pertaining to
 Medi-Cal specialty mental health services shall be determined by the department pursuant to the existing administrative appeals process of the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5722 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 157.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14707.

(a) In the case of federal audit exceptions, the department shall follow federal audit appeal processes unless the department, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, determines that those appeals are not cost beneficial.

(b) Whenever there is a final federal audit exception against the state resulting from expenditure of federal funds by individual counties, the department may offset federal reimbursement and request the Controller’s office to offset the distribution of funds to the counties from the Mental Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Equity Subaccount, and the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund, funds from the Mental Health Account and the
 Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, and any other mental health realignment funds from which the Controller makes distributions to the counties by the amount of the exception. The department shall provide evidence to the Controller that the county has been notified of the amount of the audit exception no less than 30 days before the offset is to occur. The department shall involve the appropriate counties in developing responses to any draft federal audit reports that directly impact the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 56.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14707.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to develop a performance outcome system for Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) mental health services that will improve outcomes at the individual and system levels and will inform fiscal decisionmaking related to the purchase of services.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services, in collaboration with the California Health and Human Services Agency and in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, shall create a plan for a performance outcome system for EPSDT mental healthservices
 provided to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the age of 21 pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(a)(4)(B).

(1) (A) Commencing no later than September 1, 2012, the department shall convene a stakeholder advisory committee comprised of representatives of child and youth clients, family members, providers, counties, and the Legislature.

(B) This consultation shall inform the creation of a plan for a performance outcome system for EPSDT mental health services.

(2) In developing a plan for a performance outcomes system for EPSDT mental health services, the department shall consider the following objectives, among others:

(A) High-quality and accessible
 EPSDT mental health services for eligible children and youth, consistent with federal law.

(B) Information that improves practice at the individual, program, and system levels.

(C) Minimization of costs by building upon existing resources to the fullest extent possible.

(D) Reliable data that is collected and analyzed in a timely fashion.

(3) At a minimum, the plan for a performance outcome system for EPSDT mental health services shall consider evidence-based models for performance outcome systems, such as the Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (CANS), federal requirements, including the review by the External Quality Review Organization (EQRO),
 and timelines for implementation at the provider, county, and state levels.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide the performance outcomes system plan, including milestones and timelines, for EPSDT mental health services described in subdivision (a) to all fiscal committees and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature no later than October 1, 2013.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall propose how to implement the performance outcomes system plan for EPSDT mental health services described in subdivision (a) no later than January 10, 2014.

(e) (1) (A) Commencing no later than February 1, 2014, the department shall convene a
 stakeholder advisory committee comprised of advocates for, and representatives of, child and youth clients, family members, managed care health plans, providers, counties, and the Legislature.

(B) The committee shall develop methods to routinely measure, assess, and communicate program information regarding informing, identifying, screening, assessing, referring, and linking Medi-Cal eligible beneficiaries to mental health services and supports.

(C) The committee shall also review health plan screenings for mental health, health plan referrals to Medi-Cal fee-for-service providers, and health plan referrals to county mental health plans, among others.

(D) The committee shall make recommendations to the department
 regarding performance and outcome measures that will contribute to improving timely access to appropriate care for Medi-Cal eligible beneficiaries.

(2) The department shall incorporate into the performance outcomes system established pursuant to this section the screenings and referrals described in this subdivision, including milestones and timelines, and shall provide an updated performance outcomes system plan to all fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature no later than October 1, 2014.

(3) The department shall propose how to implement the updated performance systems outcome plan described in paragraph (2) no later than January 10, 2015.

(f) This section shall become operative on
 January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 113) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 114.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14707.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to build upon performance outcomes system reports the department has developed pursuant to Section 14707.5 and the Special Terms and Conditions of the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Services Waiver, as approved pursuant to Section 1915(b) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(b)), in order to provide data to inform strategies to reduce mental health disparities.
